Utah statutes.
53-10-605.   Use of money in fund -- Criteria -- Administration.
(1)  Subject to an annual legislative appropriation from the fund to:
(a)  the committee, the committee shall:
(i)  authorize the use of the money in the fund, by grant to a local entity or
state agency in accordance with this Subsection (1) and Subsection (2);
(ii)  grant to state agencies and local entities an amount not to exceed the
per month fee levied on telecommunications service under Section 69-2-5.6 for
installation, implementation, and maintenance of unified, statewide 911
emergency services and technology; and
(iii)  in addition to any money under Subsection (1)(a)(ii), grant to counties
of the third through sixth class the amount dedicated for rural assistance,
which is at least 3 cents per month levied on telecommunications service under
Section 69-2-5.6 to:
(A)  enhance the 911 emergency services with a focus on areas or counties that
do not have E-911 services; and
(B)  where needed, assist the counties, in cooperation with private industry,
with the creation or integration of wireless systems and location technology
in rural areas of the state;
(b)  the committee, the committee shall:
(i)  include reimbursement to a provider of radio communications service, as
defined in Section 69-2-2, for costs as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(ii); and
(ii)  an agreement to reimburse costs to a provider of radio communications
services must be a written agreement among the committee, the local public
safety answering point and the carrier; and
(c)  the state's Automated Geographic Reference Center in the Division of
Integrated Technology of the Department of Technology Services, an amount
equal to 1 cent per month levied on telecommunications service under Section
69-2-5.6 shall be used to enhance and upgrade statewide digital mapping
standards.
(2) (a)  Beginning July 1, 2007, the committee may not grant the money in the
fund to a local entity unless the local entity is in compliance with Phase I,
wireless E-911 service.
(b)  Beginning July 1, 2009, the committee may not grant money in the fund to
a local entity unless the local entity is in compliance with Phase II,
wireless E-911 service.
(3)  A local entity must deposit any money it receives from the committee into
a special emergency telecommunications service fund in accordance with
Subsection 69-2-5(4).
(4)  For purposes of this part, "local entity" means a county, city, town,
local district, special service district, or interlocal entity created under
Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.
